Washington statutes.
RCW 39.48.030

"Issuer" defined.

The issuing corporations, districts, and subdivisions hereinbefore referred to and described as "issuer", shall include any county, city, town, school district, port district, metropolitan park district, taxing district, assessment district or any public corporation or municipal corporation authorized by existing law to issue bonds, securities or other evidences of indebtedness for itself or for any other taxing or assessment district therein or department thereof.

[ 1933 ex.s. c 30 s 3; RRS s 5583-13.]